New York, session 2025-2026, A2276.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-x to read as follows: 3 § 391-x. Extra charge for non-dairy alternatives prohibited. 1. No 4 chain food service establishment shall charge an additional fee for the 5 use of non-dairy alternatives in beverages. 6 2. For the purposes of this section, the term: 7 (a) "chain food service establishment" shall mean a food service 8 establishment which is one of fifteen or more such establishments that 9 are: 10 i. operated under the same name at different locations within the 11 state; and 12 ii. operated under the same ownership or by franchise agreement. 13 (b) "non-dairy alternatives" shall mean plant-based products that are 14 marketed and sold as alternatives to milk and are made from nuts, seeds, 15 rice, oats, or legumes. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05759-01-5